Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [13E.01] GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PROHIBITED; OFFICIAL GOVERNMENT RECORDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means a machine-based technology that can infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs, including content, decisions, predictions, or recommendations. Artificial intelligence includes generative technologies used to write or materially aid in writing. Artificial intelligence does not include technologies used to dictate or automatically generate captions. new text end new text begin (c) "Government entity" has the meaning given in section 13.02, subdivision 7a. new text end new text begin (d) "Official record" means recorded information, regardless of physical form or storage method, created, received, or maintained by a government entity that documents the entity's official actions, policies, decisions, or functions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Generative artificial intelligence prohibited. new text end new text begin A government entity must not use artificial intelligence to create an official record or a draft of an official record. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Retention of drafts. new text end new text begin Drafts of an official record shall be retained for as long as the final record is retained. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Attorney general. new text end new text begin The attorney general may enforce this section pursuant to section 8.31. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Private action. new text end new text begin Any individual may bring a civil action against a government entity to obtain equitable or declaratory relief to enforce this section. A prevailing plaintiff is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin No action may be commenced against a government entity under this section unless the plaintiff has provided written notice of the alleged violation to the government entity at least 90 days prior to filing suit in a manner that is reasonably calculated to enable the entity to cure the alleged violation. new text end